{"Lichen planus": {"description": "Lichen planus\u00a0is a condition that forms\u00a0an itchy rash on the skin or in the mouth.", "Possible Complications": "Mouth ulcers that are present for a long time may develop into oral cancer.", "Symptoms": ["May be tender or painful (mild cases may not cause plain)", "Are located on the sides of the tongue,\u00a0inside of the cheek, or gums", "Look like blue-white spots or \"pimples\"", "Form lines in a lacy network", "Gradually increase in size of the affected area", "Sometimes form painful ulcers", "Are usually found on the inner wrist, legs, torso, or genitals", "Are itchy", "Have even sides\u00a0(symmetrical) and sharp borders", "Occur in single lesion or clusters, often at the site of skin injury", "May be\u00a0covered with thin white streaks or scratch marks (called Wickham's striae)", "Are shiny or scaly looking", "Have a dark, reddish-purple color\u00a0on the skin or are\u00a0gray-white in the mout", "May develop blisters or ulcers", "Dry mouth", "Hair loss", "Metallic taste in the mouth", "Ridges in the nails (nail abnormalities)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may make the diagnosis based on the appearance of the skin or mouth lesions.A skin lesion biopsy or biopsy of a mouth lesion can confirm the diagnosis. Blood tests may be done to rule out hepatitis.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms and speed healing. If symptoms are mild, you may not need treatment.Treatments may include:Antihistamines, Medicines that calm down the immune system,\u00a0such as cyclosporine (in severe cases), Lidocaine mouthwashes to numb the area and make eating more comfortable (for mouth sores), Topical corticosteroids (such as clobetasol) or oral corticosteroids (such as prednisone) to reduce swelling and lower immune responses , Corticosteroids\u00a0shots\u00a0into a sore, Vitamin A as a cream (topical retinoic acid)\u00a0or taken mouth (acitretin), Other medicines that are applied\u00a0to the skin\u00a0such as tacrolimus and pimecroliumus, Dressings\u00a0 placed over\u00a0skin medicines to\u00a0protect from scratching, Ultraviolet light therapy for\u00a0some cases. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of lichen planus is unknown.\u00a0It may be related to\u00a0an allergic or immune reaction.Risks for the condition include:Exposure to medicines, dyes, and other chemicals (including gold, antibiotics, arsenic, iodides, chloroquine, quinacrine, quinide, phenothiazines, and diuretics), Diseases such as hepatitis C. Lichen planus mostly affects middle-aged adults. It is less common in children."}, "Lichen simplex chronicus": {"description": "Lichen simplex chronicus is a skin condition caused by chronic itching and scratching.", "Possible Complications": "Bacterial skin infection, Permanent changes in skin color, Permanent scar. ", "Symptoms": ["It may start when\u00a0something that rubs, irritates, or scratches the skin, such as clothing.", "The person begins to rub or scratch the itchy area. Constant scratching causes the skin to thicken.", "The thickened skin itches, causing more scratching, which causes more thickening.", "The skin may become leathery and brownish in the problem area.", "Itching of the skin \r\n\r\nMay be long-term (chronic), May be intense, Increases with nervous tension, stress. ", "May be long-term (chronic)", "May be intense", "Increases with nervous tension, stress", "Skin lesion, patch, or plaque \r\n\r\nCommonly located on the ankle, wrist, neck, rectum/anal area, forearms, thighs, lower leg, back of the knee, inner elbow, Deep skin lines over the problem area, Sharp\u00a0borders to the itchy area, Leathery texture (lichenification), Darker (hyperpigmented) or red skin, Raw areas, Scratch marks, Scaling. ", "Commonly located on the ankle, wrist, neck, rectum/anal area, forearms, thighs, lower leg, back of the knee, inner elbow", "Deep skin lines over the problem area", "Sharp\u00a0borders to the itchy area", "Leathery texture (lichenification)", "Darker (hyperpigmented) or red skin", "Raw areas", "Scratch marks", "Scaling"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at your skin and ask if you have had\u00a0chronic itching and scratching in the past. A skin lesion biopsy may be done to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "The\u00a0main treatment is to stop scratching the skin. You may have:Counseling to help you realize of the importance of not scratching, Stress management, Behavior modification.. You may need to use the following medicines on your skin:Lotion or steroid cream on the area to calm itching and irritation, Peeling ointments containing salicylic acid on patches of thick skin, \u00a0Soaps or lotions containing coal tar. You many need to use dressings that moisturize, cover, and protect the area. These\u00a0may be used with or without medicated creams. They are left in place for a week or more at a time.You may need take medicines by mouth to control itching and stress such as:Antihistamines, Sedatives, Tranquilizers\u00a0\u00a0. Steroids may be injected directly into the skin patches areas to reduce itching and irritation.You may need to take antidepressants and tranquilizers to treat\u00a0emotional causes for the problem.", "Causes": "This disorder may occur in people who have:Skin allergies, Eczema (atopic dermatitis), Psoriasis, Nervousness, anxiety, depression, and other emotional problems. The problem\u00a0is common in children, who cannot stop scratching insect bites and other itchy skin conditions. It is also found in\u00a0children who have chronic repetitive movements."}, "Liver metastases": {"description": "Cancer that starts in the liver is called\u00a0hepatocellular carcinoma.", "Possible Complications": "Complications are often the result of tumors spreading to a large area of the liver.They can include:Blockage of the flow of bile, Decreased appetite, Fever, Liver failure (usually only in the late stages of disease), Pain, Weight loss. ", "Symptoms": ["Anorexia", "Confusion", "Fever, sweating", "Jaundice\u00a0(yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes)", "Nausea", "Pain, usually in the upper right part of the abdomen", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done to diagnose liver metastases include:CT scan of the abdomen, Liver function tests, Liver biopsy, MRI of the abdomen, PET scan, Ultrasound of the abdomen . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on:The primary cancer site, How many liver tumors you have, Whether the cancer has spread to other organs , Your overall health. Types of treatments that may be used are described below.SURGERYWhen the tumor is only in one or a few areas of the liver, the cancer may be removed with surgery.CHEMOTHERAPYWhen the cancer has spread to the liver and other organs, whole-body (systemic) chemotherapy is usually used. The type of chemotherapy used depends on the original type of cancer. When the cancer has only spread in the liver, systemic chemotherapy may still be used. Chemoembolization is a type of chemotherapy to one area. A thin tube called a catheter is inserted into an artery in the groin. The catheter is threaded into the artery in the liver. Cancer-killing medicine is sent through the catheter. Then another medicine is sent through the catheter to block blood flow to the part of the liver with the tumor. This \"starves\" the cancer cells.OTHER TREATMENTSAlcohol (ethanol) injected into the liver tumor -- A needle is sent through the skin directly into the liver tumor. The alcohol kills cancer cells., Heat, using radio or microwave energy -- A large needle called a probe is placed into the center of the liver tumor. Energy is sent through thin wires called electrodes, which are attached to the probe. The cancer cells are heated and die. This method is called radiofrequency ablation when radio energy is used. It is called microwave ablation when microwave energy is used., Freezing, also called cryotherapy -- A probe is placed in contact with the tumor. A chemical is sent through the probe that causes ice crystals to form around the probe. The cancer cells are frozen and die., Radioactive beads -- These beads deliver radiation to kill the cancer cells and block the artery that goes to the tumor. This procedure is called radioembolization. It is done in much the same way as chemoembolization. . ", "Causes": "Almost any cancer can spread to the liver. Cancers that\u00a0can spread to the liver include:Breast cancer, Colorectal cancer, Esophageal cancer, Lung cancer, Melanoma, Pancreatic cancer, Stomach cancer. The risk of cancer spreading to the liver depends on the location (site) of the original cancer. A liver metastasis may be present when the original (primary) cancer is diagnosed. Or it may occur months or years after the primary tumor is removed.", "Prevention": "Early detection of some types of cancer may prevent the spread of these cancers to the liver."}, "Leptospirosis": {"description": "Leptospirosis is an infection that occurs when you come in contact with Leptospira bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Jarisch-Herxheimer reaction when penicillin is given, Meningitis, Severe bleeding. ", "Symptoms": ["Dry cough", "Fever", "Headache", "Muscle pain", "Nausea, vomiting, and diarrhea", "Shaking chills", "Abdominal pain", "Abnormal lung sounds", "Bone pain", "Conjunctivitis", "Enlarged lymph glands", "Enlarged spleen or liver", "Joint aches", "Muscle rigidity", "Muscle tenderness", "Skin rash", "Sore throat"], "Exams and Tests": "The blood is tested for antibodies to the bacteria.Other tests that may be done:Complete blood count (CBC), Creatine kinase, Liver enzymes, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "Medications to treat leptospirosis include:Ampicillin, Azithromycin, Ceftriaxone, Doxycycline, Penicillin. Complicated or serious cases may need supportive care or treatment in a hospital intensive care unit (ICU).", "Causes": "The Leptospira bacteria can be found in fresh water that has been contaminated by animal urine. The infection occurs in warmer climates.Leptospirosis\u00a0is not spread from person to person, except in vary rare cases. It occasionally spreads through sexual intercourse,\u00a0breast milk, or from a mother to her unborn child.Risk factors include:Occupational exposure -- farmers, ranchers, slaughterhouse workers, trappers, veterinarians, loggers, sewer workers, rice field workers, and military personnel, Recreational activities -- fresh water swimming, canoeing, kayaking, and trail biking in warm areas, Household exposure -- pet dogs, domesticated livestock, rainwater catchment systems, and infected rodents . Leptospirosis is rare in the continental United States. Hawaii has the highest number of cases in the United States.", "Prevention": "Avoid areas of stagnant water, especially in tropical climates. If you are exposed to a high risk area, taking doxycycline or amoxicillin may decrease your risk of developing this disease."}, "Lily of the valley": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Excessive urination at night", "Halos around objects (yellow, green, white)", "Diarrhea", "Loss of appetite", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting or nausea", "Irregular or slow heartbeat", "Confusion", "Depression", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Fainting", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Weakness", "Rash", "Hives"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Low blood sugar": {"description": "The medical name of low blood sugar is hypoglycemia.", "Possible Complications": "Severe\u00a0low blood sugar\u00a0is a medical emergency. It can cause seizures and brain damage. Severe low blood sugar that causes you to become unconscious is called insulin shock. Severe low blood sugar may make it less likely for you to have symptoms that allow you to recognize another episode of low blood sugar. \r\n", "Symptoms": ["Double vision or blurry vision", "Fast or pounding heartbeat", "Feeling cranky or acting aggressive", "Feeling nervous", "Headache", "Hunger", "Shaking or trembling", "Sweating", "Tingling or numbness of the skin", "Tiredness or weakness", "Trouble sleeping", "Unclear thinking"], "Exams and Tests": "If you check your blood sugar at home, the reading will be\u00a0lower than 70 mg/dL on your glucose monitor.At the hospital, you will likely have blood samples taken from your vein to:Measure your blood sugar level, Diagnose the cause of your low blood sugar. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to correct your low blood sugar level.If you have diabetes, it is likely your health care provider told you how to treat yourself for low blood sugar. Treatment can include drinking juice or eating food or glucose tablets. Or you may have been told to give yourself a shot of glucagon. This is a medicine that raises blood sugar. If low blood sugar is caused by an insulinoma (insulin-releasing tumor), surgery to remove the tumor will be recommended.", "Causes": "Insulin is a hormone made by the pancreas. Insulin is needed to move glucose into cells where it is used for energy. Without enough insulin, glucose builds up in the blood instead of going into the cells. This leads to symptoms of diabetes.Low blood sugar\u00a0occurs due to any of the following:Your body's sugar (glucose) is used up too quickly, Glucose is released into the bloodstream too slowly, Too much insulin is released into the bloodstream.  \r\n Low blood sugar is common in\u00a0people with diabetes who are taking insulin or other medicines to control their diabetes.Babies born to mothers with diabetes may have severe drops in blood sugar.In people who do not have diabetes, low\u00a0blood sugar\u00a0may be caused by:Drinking alcohol, Insulinoma - a rare tumor in the pancreas that produces too much insulin, Lack of a hormone, such as cortisol or thyroid hormone, Severe heart, kidney, or liver failure , Infection that affects the whole body, Some types of weight-loss surgery. "}, "Lung cancer - small cell": {"description": "Most SCLCs are of the oat cell type.", "Symptoms": ["Bloody sputum (phlegm)", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Loss of appetite", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss", "Wheezing", "Facial swelling", "Fever", "Hoarseness or changing voice", " \r\n Swallowing difficulty \r\n ", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history. You will be asked whether you smoke, and if so, how much and for how long.When listening to your chest with a stethoscope,\u00a0the doctor may\u00a0hear fluid around the lungs or areas where the lung has partially collapsed. Each of these findings\u00a0may suggest cancer.SCLC has usually spread to other parts of your body by the time it is diagnosed.Tests that may be performed include:Bone scan, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan, Liver function tests, MRI, Positron emission tomography (PET) scan, Sputum test (cytology, looking for cancer cells), Thoracentesis (removal of fluid from the chest cavity around the lungs). In most cases, a piece of tissue is removed from your lungs or other areas to be examined under a microscope. This is called a biopsy. There are several ways to do a biopsy:Bronchoscopy combined with biopsy, CT scan-directed needle biopsy, Endoscopic esophageal ultrasound (EUS) with biopsy, Mediastinoscopy with biopsy, Open lung biopsy, Pleural biopsy, Video-assisted thoracoscopy. Usually if a biopsy shows cancer, more imaging tests are done to find out the stage of the cancer. Stage means how big the tumor is and how far it has spread. SCLC is classified as either:Limited: cancer is only in the chest and can be treated with radiation therapy, Extensive: cancer has spread outside the chest. ", "Causes": "About 15% of all lung cancer cases are SCLC. Small cell lung cancer is slightly more common in men than women.Almost all cases of SCLC are due to cigarette smoking. SCLC is rare in people who have never smoked.SCLC is the most aggressive form of lung cancer. It usually starts in the breathing tubes (bronchi) in the center of the chest. Although the cancer cells are small, they grow very quickly and create large tumors. These tumors often spread rapidly (metastasize) to other parts of the body, including the brain, liver, and bone.", "Prevention": "If you smoke, now is the time to quit. Also try to avoid secondhand smoke.", "Treatment": "Because SCLC spreads quickly throughout the body, treatment must include cancer-killing drugs (chemotherapy) taken by mouth or injected into the body.Treatment with both\u00a0chemotherapy and radiation is\u00a0done for\u00a0people with SCLC that has spread throughout the body.\u00a0In this case,\u00a0the treatment only helps relieve symptoms. It does not cure the disease.Radiation therapy can be used with chemotherapy if surgery is not possible. Radiation therapy uses powerful x-rays or other forms of radiation to kill cancer cells. Radiation may be used to:Treat the cancer, along with chemotherapy, if surgery is not possible, Help relieve symptoms caused by the cancer, such as breathing problems and swelling, Help relieve cancer pain when the cancer has spread to the bones. Often, SCLC may have already spread to the brain. This can occur\u00a0even when there are no symptoms or other signs of cancer in the brain. As a result, some patients with smaller cancers, or who had a good response in their first round of chemotherapy may receive radiation therapy to the brain. This method is called prophylactic cranial irradiation (PCI).Surgery helps very few patients with SCLC because the disease has often spread by the time it is diagnosed. Surgery may be done when there is only one tumor that has not spread. If surgery is done, chemotherapy or radiation therapy is still needed."}, "Laxative overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Cramps", "Diarrhea", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody stools", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Abdominal pain", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Drop in blood pressure", "Low blood sugar", "Rash", "Abdominal pain", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Muscle weakness", "Vomiting", "Abdominal pain", "Collapse", "Coma", "Death", "Diarrhea (watery)", "Drop in blood pressure", "Flushing", "Gastrointestinal irritation", "Muscle weakness", "Painful bowel movements", "Painful urination", "Slowed breathing", "Thirst", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Lanolin poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Rash", "Swelling and redness of skin", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Liver cancer - Hepatocellular carcinoma": {"description": "Hepatocellular carcinoma is cancer that starts in\u00a0the liver.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain or tenderness, especially in the upper-right part", "Easy bruising or bleeding", "Enlarged abdomen", "Yellow skin or eyes (jaundice)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. The physical exam may show an enlarged, tender liver.If the doctor suspects liver cancer, tests that may be ordered include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Liver biopsy, Liver enzymes (liver function tests), Liver MRI, Serum alpha fetoprotein. Some high-risk patients may get regular blood tests and ultrasounds to see whether tumors are developing.", "Causes": "Hepatocellular carcinoma accounts for most liver cancers. This type of cancer occurs more often in men than women. It is usually seen in people age 50 or older.Hepatocellular carcinoma is not the same as metastatic liver cancer, which starts in another organ (such as the breast or colon) and spreads to the liver.In most cases, the cause of liver cancer is scarring of the liver (cirrhosis). Cirrhosis may be caused by:Alcohol abuse, Autoimmune diseases of the liver, Hepatitis B or C virus infection, Inflammation of the liver that is long-term (chronic), Iron overload in the body (hemochromatosis). Patients with hepatitis B or C are at high risk of liver cancer, even if they\u00a0do not develop cirrhosis.", "Prevention": "Preventing and treating viral hepatitis may help reduce your risk. Childhood vaccination against hepatitis B may reduce the risk of liver cancer in the future., Do not drink excessive amounts of alcohol., Persons with certain types of hemochromatosis may need to be screened for liver cancer., Persons who have hepatitis B or C or cirrhosis may be recommended for liver cancer screening.. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on how advanced the cancer is.Surgery may be done if the tumor has not spread. Before surgery, the tumor may be treated with chemotherapy\u00a0to reduce its size. This is done by delivering the medicine straight into the liver with a tube (catheter).Radiation treatments in the area of the cancer may also be helpful. But many patients have liver cirrhosis or other liver diseases that make these treatments more difficult.Ablation is another method that may be used. (Ablate means to destroy.) Types of ablation include using:Radio waves or microwaves, Ethanol (an alcohol) or acetic acid (vinegar), Extreme cold (cryoablation). A liver transplant may be recommended for certain persons who have both cancer and cirrhosis. "}, "Lead poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Behavior or attention problems", "Failure at school", "Hearing problems", "Kidney damage", "Reduced IQ", "Slowed body growth", "Abdominal pain and cramping (usually the first sign of a high, toxic dose of lead poison)", "Aggressive behavior", "Anemia", "Constipation", "Difficulty sleeping", "Headaches", "Irritability", "Loss of previous developmental skills (in young children)", "Low appetite and energy", "Reduced sensations"], "description": "Lead is a very strong poison. When a person swallows a lead object or breathes in lead dust, some of the poison can stay in the body and cause serious health problems."}, "Lavender oil": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision ", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat ", "Burns to the eye (if you get it in your eye)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody) ", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Rash "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Language disorder - children": {"description": "Children with language disorders are able to produce sounds and their speech can be understood.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty understanding and using language can cause problems with social interaction and the ability to function independently as an adult.Reading may be a problem.Depression, anxiety, and other emotional or behavioral problems may complicate language disorders.", "Symptoms": ["A hard time understanding what other people have said", "Problems following directions that are spoken to them", "Problems organizing their thoughts ", "Have a hard time putting words together into sentences, or their sentences may be simple and short and the word order may be off", "Have difficulty finding the right words when talking, and often use placeholder words such as \"um\"", "Have a vocabulary that is below the level of other children the same age", "Leave words out of sentences when talking", "Use certain phrases over and over again, and repeat (echo) parts or all of questions", "Use tenses (past, present, future) improperly "], "Exams and Tests": "A medical history may reveal that the child has close relatives who have also had speech and language problems.Any child suspected of having this disorder can have standardized receptive and expressive language tests. A speech and language therapist or neuropsychologist will administer these tests.A hearing test called audiometry\u00a0should also be done to rule out deafness, which is one of the most common causes of language problems.", "Treatment": "Speech and language therapy is the best approach to treating this type of language disorder.Psychological therapy (psychotherapy, counseling, or cognitive behavioral therapy) is also recommended because of the possibility of related emotional or behavioral problems.", "Causes": "For most infants and children, language develops naturally beginning at birth. To develop language, a child must be able to hear, see, understand, and remember. Children must also have the physical ability to form speech.Up to 1 out of every 20 children has symptoms of a language disorder. When the cause is unknown, it is called a developmental language disorder.Problems with receptive language skills usually begin before age 4. Some mixed language disorders are caused by a brain injury. These conditions\u00a0are sometimes misdiagnosed as developmental disorders.Language disorders may occur in children with other developmental problems, autistic spectrum disorder, hearing loss, and learning disabilities. A language disorder may also be caused by damage to the central nervous system, which is called aphasia.Language disorders are rarely caused by a lack of intelligence.Language disorders are different than delayed language. With delayed language, the child develops speech and language in the same way as other children, but later. In language disorders, speech and language do not develop normally. The child may have some language skills, but not others. Or, the way in which these skills develop will be different than usual."}, "Leukoplakia": {"description": "Leukoplakia are patches on the tongue, in the mouth, or on the inside of the cheek. ", "Symptoms": ["Usually white or gray", "Uneven in shape", "Fuzzy (hairy leukoplakia)", "Slightly raised with a hard surface", "Unable to be scraped off ", "Painful when the mouth patches come into contact with acidic or spicy food"], "Exams and Tests": "A biopsy of the lesion confirms the diagnosis. Examination of the biopsy may find changes that indicate oral cancer.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nLeukoplakia affects the mucus membranes of the mouth. The exact cause is not known. Doctors think it may be due to irritation such as: Rough teeth , Rough places on dentures, fillings, and crowns , Smoking or other tobacco use (smoker's keratosis), especially pipes , Holding chewing tobacco or snuff in the mouth for a long period of time\u00a0 , Drinking a lot of alcohol. The disorder is most common in elderly persons.A type of leukoplakia of the mouth called hairy leukoplakia is caused by the Epstein-Barr virus. It is seen mostly in persons with HIV/AIDS. It may be one of the first signs of HIV infection. Hairy leukoplakia can also appear in other people whose immune system is not working well, such as after a bone marrow transplant. ", "Prevention": "Stop smoking or using other tobacco products. Do not drink alcohol, or limit how many drinks you have. Have rough teeth treated and dental appliances repaired promptly.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to get rid of the leukoplakia patch. Removing the source of irritation may cause the\u00a0patch to disappear.Treat dental causes such as rough teeth, irregular denture surface, or fillings as soon as possible., Stop smoking or using other tobacco products., Do not drink alcohol.. If removing the source of the irritation does not work, the doctor may suggest applying medicine to the patch or using surgery to remove it.For hairy leukoplakia, taking antiviral medicine usually causes the patch to disappear. The doctor may also suggest applying medicine to the patch. \r\n "}, "Ludwig\u2019s angina": {"description": "Ludwig's angina is an infection of the floor of the mouth under the tongue. It is due to bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Airway blockage, Generalized infection (sepsis), Septic shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Confusion or other mental changes", "Fever", "Neck pain", "Neck swelling", "Redness of the neck", "Weakness, fatigue, excess tiredness", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling", "Earache", "Speech that is unusual and sounds like the person has a \"hot potato\" in the mouth"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do an exam of your neck and head to look for redness and swelling of the upper neck, under the chin.The swelling may reach to the floor of the mouth. Your tongue may be swollen or out of place.You may need a CT scan of the neck. \u00a0A sample of the fluid from the tissue may be sent to the lab to test for bacteria.", "Treatment": "If the swelling blocks the airway, you need to get emergency medical help right away. A breathing tube through your mouth or nose and into the lungs to restore breathing. You may need to have surgery called a tracheostomy that creates an opening through the neck into the windpipe.Antibiotics are given to fight the infection. They are usually given through a vein until symptoms go away. Antibiotics taken by mouth may be continued until tests show that the bacteria have gone away.Dental treatment may be needed for tooth infections that cause Ludwig's angina.Surgery may be needed to drain fluids that are causing the swelling.", "Causes": "Ludwig's angina is a type of skin infection that occurs on the floor of the mouth, under the tongue. It often develops after an infection of the roots of the teeth (such as tooth abscess) or a mouth injury.This condition is uncommon in children.", "Prevention": "Visit the dentist for regular checkups.Treat symptoms of mouth or tooth infection right away."}, "Legionnaire disease": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough that does not produce much sputum or mucus (dry cough)", "Coughing up blood", "Diarrhea, nausea, vomiting, and abdominal pain", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Joint pain", "Loss of energy", "Muscle aches and stiffness", "Problems with balance", "Shaking chills ", "Shortness of breath "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Abnormal sounds called crackles may be heard\u00a0when listening to the chest with a stethoscope.Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gases, Blood culturesBronchoscopy, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), including white blood cell countESR (sed rate), Liver\u00a0blood tests, Tests and\u00a0cultures on sputum to identify\u00a0the Legionella bacteria, Urine tests to check for Legionella pneumophila bacteria. ", "description": "Legionnaire disease is an infection\u00a0of the lungs and airways\u00a0caused by Legionella bacteria.", "Causes": "The bacteria that cause Legionnaire disease have been found in water delivery systems. They can survive in the warm, moist, air conditioning systems of large buildings, including hospitals.Most cases are caused by the bacteria\u00a0Legionella pneumophila. The rest of the cases are caused by other Legionella species.Spread of the bacteria from person to person has not been proven.Most infections occur in middle-age or older people. In\u00a0rare cases,\u00a0children can get the infection. When they do, the disease is less severe.Risk factors include:Alcohol abuse\u00a0, Cigarette smoking, Chronic illnesses such as kidney failure or diabetes, Weakened immune system, such as during cancer treatment or taking steroid medicines, Long-term (chronic) lung disease, such as COPD\u00a0, Long-term use of a breathing machine (ventilator), Medicines that suppress the immune system, including chemotherapy and steroid medications, Older age. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to fight the infection. Treatment is started as soon as Legionnaire disease is suspected, without waiting for results of any lab test.Other treatments may include receiving fluids and oxygen, which is given through a mask or breathing machine."}, "Laryngitis": {"description": "Laryngitis is swelling and irritation (inflammation) of the voice box (larynx).\u00a0Laryngitis is usually associated with hoarseness or loss of voice.", "Possible Complications": "In rare cases, severe respiratory distress develops. This requires immediate\u00a0medical attention.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Hoarseness", "Swollen lymph nodes or glands in the neck"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam can find\u00a0whether hoarseness is caused by a respiratory tract infection.Patients with hoarseness that lasts more than a month (especially smokers) will need to see an ear, nose, and throat doctor (otolaryngologist) for tests of the throat and upper airway.", "Treatment": "Common laryngitis is often caused by a virus, therefore\u00a0antibiotics likely will\u00a0not help. Your health care provider will make this decision.Resting your voice helps\u00a0to reduce inflammation of the vocal cords. A humidifier may soothe the scratchy feeling that comes with laryngitis. Decongestants and pain medicines\u00a0may relieve the symptoms of an upper respiratory infection.", "Causes": "The voice box (larynx) is located at the top of the airway to the lungs (trachea). The larynx contains the vocal cords. When the vocal cords become inflamed or infected, they swell. This can cause hoarseness. Sometimes the airway can get\u00a0blocked.The most common form of laryngitis is an infection caused by a virus, such as cold or flu viruses. It may also be caused by:Allergies, Bacterial infection, Bronchitis, Gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD), Injury, Irritants and chemicals, Pneumonia. Laryngitis often occurs with an upper respiratory infection.Several forms of laryngitis occur in children that can lead to dangerous or fatal respiratory blockage. These forms include:Croup, Epiglottitis. ", "Prevention": "Try to avoid people who have upper respiratory infections during cold and flu season., Wash your hands often., Do not strain your voice., Stopping smoking\u00a0can help prevent tumors of the head and neck or lungs, which\u00a0can lead to hoarseness.. "}, "Lung cancer - non-small cell": {"description": "There are three common\u00a0types of NSCLC:", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough that does not go away", "Coughing up blood", "Fatigue", "Loss of appetite", "Losing weight without trying", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Eyelid drooping", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Joint pain", "Nail problems", "Swallowing difficulty", "Swelling of the face", "Weakness", "Shoulder pain or weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history. You will be asked if you smoke, and if so, how much you smoke and for how long. You will also be asked about other things that may have put you at risk of lung cancer, such as exposure to certain chemicals.When listening to the chest with a stethoscope, the doctor may hear fluid around the lungs. This may suggest cancer. Tests that may be\u00a0done to diagnose lung cancer or see if it has spread include:Bone scan, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of the chest, MRI of the chest, Positron emission tomography (PET) scan, Sputum test to look for cancer cells, Thoracentesis (sampling of fluid buildup around the lung) . In\u00a0most cases, a piece of tissue is removed from your lungs for examination under a microscope. This is called a biopsy. There are several ways to do this:Bronchoscopy combined with biopsy, CT-scan-directed needle biopsy, Endoscopic esophageal ultrasound (EUS) with biopsy, Mediastinoscopy with biopsy, Open lung biopsy, Pleural biopsy. If the biopsy shows cancer, more imaging tests\u00a0are done to\u00a0find out\u00a0the stage of the cancer. Stage means how big the tumor is and how far it has spread.\u00a0NSCLC is divided into five stages:Stage 0 - the cancer has not spread beyond the inner lining of the lung, Stage I - the cancer is small and has not spread to the lymph nodes, Stage II - the cancer has spread to some lymph nodes near the original tumor, Stage III - the cancer has spread to nearby tissue or to far away lymph nodes, Stage IV - the cancer has spread to other organs of the body, such as the other lung, brain, or liver . ", "Causes": "Smoking causes most cases (around 90%) of lung cancer. The risk depends on the number of cigarettes you smoke each day and for how long you have smoked. Being around the smoke from other people (secondhand smoke) also raises your risk\u00a0of lung cancer.\u00a0But some people who do not smoke and have never smoked do develop lung cancer.Research shows that smoking marijuana may help cancer cells grow. But there is no direct link between\u00a0smoking marijuana\u00a0and developing lung cancer.Constant exposure to high levels of air pollution and drinking water that has\u00a0a high level of arsenic can increase your risk\u00a0of lung cancer. A history of radiation therapy to the lungs can also increase risk.Working with or near cancer-causing chemicals or materials can also increase risk. Such chemicals include:Asbestos, Chemicals such as uranium, beryllium, vinyl chloride, nickel chromates, coal products, mustard gas, chloromethyl ethers, gasoline, and diesel exhaust, Certain alloys, paints, pigments, and preservatives, Products using chloride and formaldehyde . ", "Prevention": "If you smoke, now is the time to quit. If you are having trouble quitting, talk with your doctor. There are many methods to help you quit, from support groups to prescription medicines.\u00a0Also, try to avoid secondhand smoke.If you smoke or used to smoke, talk with your doctor about getting screened for lung cancer. To get screened, you need to have a CT scan of the chest.\u00a0", "Treatment": "There are many different types of treatment for NSCLC. Treatment depends on the stage of the cancer.Surgery is the\u00a0common treatment for\u00a0NSCLC that has not spread beyond nearby lymph nodes. The surgeon may remove:One of the lobes of the lung (lobectomy), Only a small part of the lung (wedge or segment removal), The entire lung (pneumonectomy) . Some patients need chemotherapy. Chemotherapy uses drugs to kill cancer cells and stop new cells from growing. Treatment may be done in the following ways:Chemotherapy alone is often used when the cancer has spread outside the lung (stage IV)., It may also be given before surgery or radiation to make those treatments more effective. This is called neoadjuvant therapy., It may be given after surgery to kill any remaining cancer. This is called adjuvant therapy. . Controlling symptoms and preventing complications during and after chemotherapy is an important part of care.Radiation therapy can be used with chemotherapy if surgery is not possible. Radiation therapy uses powerful x-rays or other forms of radiation to kill cancer cells. Radiation may be used to:Treat the cancer, along with chemotherapy, if surgery is not possible, Help relieve symptoms caused by the cancer, such as breathing problems and swelling, Help relieve cancer pain when the cancer has spread to the bones . Controlling symptoms during and after radiation to the chest is an important part of care.The following treatments are mostly used to relieve symptoms caused by NSCLC:Laser therapy - a small beam of light burns and kills cancer cells, Photodynamic therapy - uses a light to activate a drug in the body, which kills cancer cells. "}, "Lighter fluid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue ", "Decreased urine output ", "Blood in the stool", "Severe abdominal pain", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly ", "Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty) ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Easy excitability", "Extreme sleepiness (possibly even coma)", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Inability to sleep", "Irritability", "Lack of desire to do anything", "Tremor", "Twitching", "Uncoordinated movements", "Staggering ", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Low blood sugar - newborns": {"description": "Low blood sugar level in newborn babies is also called neonatal hypoglycemia. It refers to low blood sugar (glucose) in the first few days after birth.", "Possible Complications": "Severe or persistent low blood sugar level may affect the baby's mental function. In rare cases, heart failure or seizures may occur.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish-colored or pale skin", "Breathing problems, such as pauses in breathing (apnea), rapid breathing, or a grunting sound", "Irritability or listlessness", "Loose or floppy muscles", "Poor feeding or vomiting", "Problems keeping the body warm", "Tremors, shakiness, sweating, or seizures"], "Exams and Tests": "Newborns at risk for hypoglycemia should have a blood test to measure blood sugar level every few hours after birth. This will be done using a heel stick. The health care provider should continue taking blood tests until the baby's glucose level stays normal for about 12 to 24 hours.Other possible tests:Newborn screening for metabolic disorders, Urine tests. ", "Treatment": "Infants with low blood sugar level will need to receive extra feedings with breast milk or formula. Babies who are breast-fed may need to receive extra formula if the mother is not able to produce enough breast milk. (Hand expression and massage can help mothers express more milk.)The infant may need a sugar solution given through a vein (intravenously) if unable to eat by mouth, or if the blood sugar level is very low.Treatment will be continued until the baby can maintain blood sugar level. This may take hours or days. Infants who were born early, have an infection, or were born at a low weight may need to be treated for a longer period of time.If the low blood sugar continues, in rare cases the baby may also receive medicine to increase blood sugar level. In very rare cases, newborns with very severe hypoglycemia who do not improve with treatment may need surgery to remove part of the pancreas (to reduce insulin production).", "Causes": "Babies need blood sugar (glucose) for energy. Most of that glucose is used by the brain.The baby gets glucose from the mother through the placenta before birth. After birth, the baby gets glucose from the mother through her milk or from formula, and the baby also produces it in the liver.Glucose level can drop if:There is too much insulin in the blood (hyperinsulinism). Insulin is a hormone that pulls glucose from the blood., The baby is not producing enough glucose., The baby's body is using more glucose than is being produced., The baby is not able to feed enough to keep glucose level up.. Neonatal hypoglycemia occurs when the newborn's glucose level is below the level considered safe for the baby's age. It occurs in about 1 to 3 out of every 1,000 births.Low blood sugar level is\u00a0more likely in infants with one or more of these risk factors:Born early, have a serious infection, or needed oxygen right after delivery, Mother has diabetes (these infants are often larger than normal), Have slower than usual growth in the womb during pregnancy, Are smaller in size than normal for their gestational age. ", "Prevention": "If you have diabetes during pregnancy, work with your health care provider to control your blood sugar level. Be sure that your newborn's blood sugar level\u00a0is monitored after birth."}, "Low back pain - chronic": {"Symptoms": ["Dull aching", "Sharp pain", "Tingling or burning sensation", "Weakness in your legs or feet "], "Exams and Tests": "During the physical exam, the health care provider will try to pinpoint the location of the pain and figure out how it affects your movement.Other tests you have depend on your medical history and symptoms.Tests may include:Blood tests,\u00a0such as\u00a0a complete blood count and erythrocyte sedimentation rate, CT scan of the lower spine, MRI scan of the lower spine, Myelogram (x-ray or CT scan of the spine after dye has been injected into the spinal column), X-ray. ", "description": "Low back pain that is long-term is called chronic low back pain. ", "Causes": "A single event may not have caused your pain. You may have been doing many\u00a0activities, such as lifting the wrong way, for a long time.\u00a0Then suddenly, one simple movement, such as reaching for something or bending from your waist, leads to pain.Many people with chronic back pain have arthritis.\u00a0Or they may\u00a0have\u00a0extra wear and tear of the spine, which may be due to:Heavy use from work or sports, Injuries\u00a0or fractures , Surgery. You may have had a herniated disk,\u00a0in which\u00a0part of the spinal disk pushed onto nearby nerves. Normally, the disks provide space and cushion in your spine. If these disks dry out and become thinner and more brittle, you can lose movement in the spine over time.If the spaces between the spinal nerves and spinal cord become narrowed, this can lead to spinal stenosis. These problems are called degenerative joint or spine disease.Other possible causes of chronic low back pain include:Curvature of the spine, such as scoliosis or kyphosis, Medical problems, such as fibromyalgia\u00a0or rheumatoid arthritis, Piriformis syndrome, a pain disorder involving a muscle in the buttocks called the piriformis muscle\u00a0. You are at greater risk for low back pain if you:Are over age 30, Are overweight, Are pregnant, Do not exercise, Feel stressed or depressed, Have a job in which you have to do heavy lifting, bending and twisting, or that involves whole body vibration, such as truck driving or using a sandblaster, Smoke . ", "Treatment": "Your back pain may not go away completely, or it may get more painful at times. Learn to take care of your back at home and how to prevent repeat episodes of back pain. This\u00a0can help you continue with your normal activities.Your doctor may recommend measures to reduce your pain, including:A back brace to support your back, Cold packs and heat therapy, Traction, Physical therapy, involving stretching and strengthening exercises, Counseling, to learn ways to understand and manage your pain. These health care providers can also help:Massage therapist, Someone who performs acupuncture, Someone who does spinal manipulation (a chiropractor, osteopathic physician, or physical therapist). If needed, your doctor may prescribe medicines to help with your back pain:Aspirin, naproxen (Aleve), or ibuprofen (Advil), which you can buy without a prescription, Low doses of prescription medicines, Narcotics or opioids when the pain is severe. If your pain does not\u00a0improve with medicine, physical therapy, and other treatments, your doctor may recommend an epidural injection.Spinal surgery is considered only if you have nerve damage or the cause of the back pain does not heal after a long time. In some patients, a spinal cord stimulator can help reduce back pain.Other treatments that may be recommended if your pain does not improve with medicine and physical therapy include:Epidural injection, Spinal surgery, only if you have nerve damage or the cause of your pain does not heal after a long time , Spinal cord stimulation, in which a small device sends electric current to the spine to block pain signals\u00a0. Some people with low back pain may also need:Job changes, Job counseling, Job retraining, Occupational therapy. "}, "Limb-girdle muscular dystrophies": {"description": "Limb-girdle muscular dystrophies include at least 18 different inherited disorders, which first affect the muscles around the shoulder girdle and hips. These diseases get worse, and may eventually involve other muscles.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal heart rhythms, Contractures of the joints, Difficulties with activities of daily living due to shoulder weakness, Progressive weakness, which may lead to needing a wheelchair. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal, sometimes waddling, walk", "Joints that are fixed in a contracted position (late in the disease)", "Large and muscular-looking calves (pseudohypertrophy), which are not actually strong", "Loss of muscle mass, thinning of certain body parts", "Low back pain ", "Palpitations or passing-out spells", "Shoulder weakness ", "Weakness of the muscles in the face (later in the disease)", "Weakness in the muscles of the lower legs, feet, lower arms, and hands (later in the disease) "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood creatine kinase levels, DNA testing, Echocardiogram or ECG, Electromyogram (EMG) testing, Muscle biopsy. ", "Treatment": "There are no known treatments that reverse the muscle weakness. Gene therapy may become available in the future. Supportive treatment can decrease the complications of the disease.The condition is managed based on the person\u2019s symptoms. It includes:Heart monitoring, Mobility aids, Physical therapy, Respiratory care, Weight control. Surgery is\u00a0sometimes needed for any bone or joint problems.", "Causes": "Limb-girdle muscular dystrophies are a large group of genetic diseases in which there is muscle weakness and wasting (muscular dystrophy).In most cases, both parents must pass on the non-working (defective) gene for a child to have the disease (autosomal recessive disorder). In some rare types, only one parent needs to pass on the bad gene to affect the child. This is called an autosomal dominant disorder. For some of these conditions, the defective gene has been discovered. For others, the gene is not yet known.An important risk factor is having a family member with muscular dystrophy.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may\u00a0help some\u00a0couples and families learn\u00a0about the risks and help with family planning.Some of the complications can be prevented with appropriate treatment. For example, a cardiac pacemaker or defibrillator can greatly reduce the risk of sudden death due to an abnormal heart rhythm. Physical therapy may be able to prevent or delay contractures and improve quality of life.Affected people may want to do DNA banking. DNA testing is recommended for those who are affected. This helps to identify the family gene mutation. Once the mutation is found, prenatal DNA testing, testing for carriers, and pre-implantation genetic diagnosis are possible."}, "Low potassium level": {"description": "Low potassium level is a problem in which the amount of potassium in the blood is lower than normal. The medical name\u00a0of this condition is hypokalemia.\u00a0", "Possible Complications": "In severe cases, patients can develop paralysis that can be life-threatening. This is more common when there is too much thyroid hormone\u00a0in the blood. \u00a0This is called thyrotoxic periodic paralysis.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal heart rhythms (dysrhythmias), especially in people with heart disease\r\n ", "Constipation", "Feeling of skipped heart beats or palpitations", "Fatigue\r\n ", "Muscle damage\r\n ", "Muscle weakness or spasms\r\n ", "Tingling or numbness\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will order a blood test to check your potassium level. Other blood tests may be ordered to check levels of:Glucose, magnesium, calcium, sodium, phosphorous, Thyroid hormone, Aldosterone. An electrocardiogram (ECG) to check the heart may also be done.", "Treatment": "If your condition is mild, your doctor will likely prescribe oral potassium pills. If your condition is severe, you may need to get potassium through a vein ( IV).If you need diuretics, you doctor may:Switch you to a form that keeps potassium in the body. This type of diuretic is called potassium-sparing., Prescribe extra potassium for you to take every day.. Eating foods rich in potassium can help treat and prevent low level of potassium. These foods include: Avocados, Baked potato, Bananas, Bran, Carrots, Cooked lean beef, Milk, Oranges, Peanut butter, Peas and beans, Salmon, Seaweed, Spinach, Tomatoes, Wheat germ. ", "Causes": "Potassium is needed for cells to function properly. You get potassium through food. The kidneys remove excess potassium in the urine to keep a proper balance of the mineral in the body.Common causes of\u00a0low potassium level include:Antibiotics\r\n , Diarrhea or vomiting\r\n , Using too much laxative, which can cause diarrhea\r\n , Chronic kidney disease\r\n , Diuretic medicines (water pills), used to treat heart failure and high blood pressure\r\n , Eating disorders (such as bulimia)\r\n , Low magnesium level, Sweating\r\n . "}, "Lupus anticoagulants": {"Symptoms": ["Blood clots in the legs or the lungs as well as stroke or heart attack", "Recurrent miscarriages"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be done: Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Russell viper venom time, Thromboplastin inhibition test. ", "description": "Persons with these antibodies may have an abnormally high risk of blood clotting.", "Causes": "Most often lupus anticoagulants are found in persons with diseases such as systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE).Lupus anticoagulants may also occur if:You take certain medicines, such as phenothiazines, phenytoin, hydralazine, quinine, and the antibiotic amoxicillin.. You have conditions such as:Inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn's disease and ulcerative colitis), infections, and certain kinds of tumors.. Some people have no risk factors for this condition.", "Treatment": "Often, you will not need treatment if you do not have symptoms or if you have never had a blood clot in the past.Take the following steps to help prevent blood clots from forming:Avoid most birth control pills or hormone treatments for menopause (women)., Do not smoke or use other tobacco products., Get up and move around during long plane flights or other times when you have to sit or lie down for extended periods., Move your ankles up and down when you can not\u00a0move around.. Your doctor may prescribe blood thinning medicines (such as heparin and warfarin) to help prevent blood clots:After surgery, After a bone fracture, With active cancer, When you need to set or lie down for long periods of time, such as during a hospital stay or recovering at home.. You may also need to take blood thinners for 3 to 4 weeks after surgery to lower your risk of blood clots."}, "Lomotil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blockage in the bowel (paralytic ileus)", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness, lack of responsiveness)", "Constipation", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Dry skin and mucus membranes (mouth)", "Eyes with pinpoint or enlarged pupils", "Eyes that move quickly from side to side (nystagmus)", "Flushed skin", "Hallucinations", "Rapid heartbeat", "Restlessness", "Slow breathing or breathing that has stopped", "Urination difficulty", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Lupus nephritis": {"description": "Lupus nephritis is a kidney disorder that is a complication of systemic lupus erythematosus.", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure, Chronic renal failure, End-stage renal disease, Nephrotic syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "Foamy appearance to urine", "High blood pressure", "Swelling of any area of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam shows signs of decreased kidney functioning with body swelling (edema). Blood pressure may be high. Abnormal sounds may be heard when the doctor listens to your heart and lungs.Tests that may be done include:ANA titer, BUN and creatinine, Complement levels, Urinalysis, Urine protein. This list may not be all-inclusive.A kidney biopsy is not used to diagnose lupus nephritis, but to determine what treatment is appropriate.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to improve kidney function and to delay kidney failure.Medicines may include corticosteroids or other medications that suppress the immune system, such as cyclophosphamide, mycophenolate mofetil, or azathioprine.You may need dialysis to control symptoms of kidney failure, sometimes for only a while. A kidney transplant may be recommended. People with active lupus should not have a transplant because the condition can occur in the transplanted kidney.", "Causes": "Systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE, or lupus) is an autoimmune disease. This means there is a problem with the body's immune system.Normally, the immune system helps protect the body from infection or harmful substances. But in patients with an autoimmune disease, the immune system cannot tell the difference between harmful substances and healthy ones. As a result, the immune system attacks otherwise healthy cells and tissue.SLE may damage different parts of the kidney, leading to interstitial nephritis, nephrotic syndrome, and membranous GN. It may rapidly worsen to kidney failure.Lupus nephritis affects approximately 3 out of every 10,000 people. In children with SLE, about half will have some form or degree of kidney involvement.More than half of patients have not had other symptoms of SLE when they are diagnosed with lupus nephritis.SLE is most common in women ages 20 - 40. For more information, see: systemic lupus erythematosus.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for lupus nephritis."}, "Lateral collateral ligament (LCL) injury": {"Symptoms": ["Knee swelling", "Locking or catching of the knee with movement", "Pain or tenderness along the outside of the knee", "Knee gives way, or feels like it is going to give way, when it is active or stressed in a certain way"], "Causes": "The LCL is usually injured by pressure or an injury that pushes the knee joint from the inside, which results in stress on the outside part of the joint.", "description": "It can be a stretch, partial tear, or complete tear of the ligament.", "Prevention": "Use proper technique when exercising or playing sports. Many cases may not be preventable."}, "Lung metastases": {"description": "Lung metastases are cancerous tumors that start somewhere else in the body and spread to the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Fluid around the heart (pericardial effusion), which can cause shortness of breath, Fluid between the lung and chest wall (pleural effusion), which can cause shortness of breath or pain when taking a deep breath, Further spread of the cancer, Side effects of chemotherapy or radiation therapy . ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody sputum", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask about your medical history and symptoms. Tests that may be done include:Bronchoscopy to view the airways\u00a0, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Cytologic studies of pleural fluid or sputum, Lung needle biopsy, Surgery to take a sample of tissue from the lungs (surgical lung biopsy) . ", "Treatment": "Chemotherapy is usually used to treat metastatic cancer to the lung. Surgery to remove the tumors may be done when any of the following occurs:The first (primary) tumor has been removed, The cancer has spread to only limited areas of the lung, The lung tumors can be completely removed with surgery . However, the main tumor must be curable, and the patient must be strong enough to go through the surgery and recovery.Less common treatments include:Radiation therapy, The placement of stents inside the airways, Laser therapy . There are other experimental treatments. One of these treatments uses local heat probes to destroy the area. Another places chemotherapy medicines directly into the artery that supplies blood to the part of the lung containing the tumor.", "Causes": "Metastatic tumors in the lungs are cancers that developed at other places in the body (or other parts of the lungs) and spread through the bloodstream or lymphatic system to the lungs. It is different than lung cancer that starts in the lungs. Nearly any cancer can spread to the lungs. Common cancers include:Bladder cancer, Breast cancer, Colon cancer, Kidney cancer, Neuroblastoma, Prostate cancer, Sarcoma, Wilms tumor. ", "Prevention": "Not all cancers can be prevented. However, many can be prevented by:Eating healthy\u00a0foods, Exercising regularly, Limiting alcohol consumption, Not smoking . "}, "Leprosy": {"description": "Leprosy is a disease that has been known since biblical times. This infectious disease causes skin sores, nerve damage, and muscle weakness that gets worse over time.", "Possible Complications": "Disfigurement, Muscle weakness, Permanent nerve damage in the arms and legs, Sensory loss. People with long-term leprosy may lose the use of their hands or feet due to repeated injury because they lack feeling in those areas.", "Symptoms": ["Skin lesions that are lighter than your normal skin color \r\n\r\nLesions have decreased sensation to touch, heat, or pain, Lesions do not heal after several weeks to months. ", "Lesions have decreased sensation to touch, heat, or pain", "Lesions do not heal after several weeks to months", "Muscle weakness", "Numbness or lack of feeling in the hands, arms, feet, and legs"], "Exams and Tests": "Lepromin skin test can be used to tell the two different forms of leprosy apart, but it is not used to diagnose the disease, Skin lesion biopsy, Skin scraping examination. ", "Treatment": "A number of different antibiotics (including dapsone, rifampin, clofazamine, fluoroquinolones, macrolides, and minocycline) are used to kill the bacteria that cause the disease. More than one antibiotic is often given together.Aspirin, prednisone, or thalidomide is used to control inflammation.", "Causes": "Leprosy is caused by the bacterium Mycobacterium leprae. It is not very contagious and it has a long incubation period (time before symptoms appear), which makes it hard to know where or when someone caught the disease. Children are more likely than adults to get the disease.Leprosy has two common forms: tuberculoid and lepromatous. Both forms produce sores on the skin. However, the lepromatous form is most severe. It causes large lumps and bumps (nodules).Leprosy is common in many countries worldwide, and in temperate, tropical, and subtropical climates. About 100 cases per year are diagnosed in the United States. Most cases are in the South, California, Hawaii, and U.S. islands.Effective medications exist. Isolating people with this disease in \"leper colonies\" is not needed.Drug-resistant Mycobacterium leprae and an increased numbers of cases worldwide have led to global concern about this disease.", "Prevention": "Prevention consists of avoiding close physical contact with untreated people. People on long-term medication become noninfectious (they do not transmit the organism that causes the disease)."}, "Lip moisturizer poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Eye irritation (if the product touched the eye)", "Intestinal blockage", "Nausea", "Shortness of breath (with extremely high doses)", "Vomiting"], "description": "For information regarding allergic reactions to this substance, see para-aminobenzoic acid allergy."}, "Lymphadenitis": {"description": "Lymphadenitis is an infection of the lymph nodes (also called lymph glands). It is a common complication of certain bacterial infections.", "Possible Complications": "Abscess formation, Cellulitis (a skin infection), Fistulas (seen in lymphadenitis that is due to tuberculosis), Sepsis (bloodstream infection). ", "Symptoms": ["Red, tender skin over lymph node", "Swollen, tender, or hard lymph nodes"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This\u00a0includes feeling your lymph nodes and looking for signs of injury or infection around any swollen lymph nodes.A biopsy and culture of the affected area or node may reveal the cause of the inflammation. Blood cultures may reveal spread of infection to the bloodstream.", "Treatment": "Lymphadenitis may spread within hours. Treatment should begin promptly.Treatment may include:Antibiotics to treat any infection , Analgesics (painkillers) to control pain, Anti-inflammatory medications to reduce inflammation, Cool compresses to reduce inflammation and pain. Surgery may be needed to drain an abscess.", "Causes": "The lymph system is a network of lymph nodes, lymph ducts, lymph vessels, and organs that produce and move a fluid called lymph from tissues to the bloodstream. The lymph glands, or nodes, are small structures that filter the lymph fluid. There are many white blood cells in the lymph nodes to help fight infection.Lymphadenitis occurs when the glands become enlarged by swelling (inflammation),\u00a0often in response to bacteria, viruses, or fungi. The swollen glands are usually found near the site of an infection, tumor, or inflammation.Lymphadenitis may occur after skin infections or other infections caused by bacteria such as Streptococcus or Staphylococcus. Sometimes it is caused by rare infections such as tuberculosis or cat scratch disease (Bartonella).", "Prevention": "Good general health and hygiene are helpful in the prevention of any infection."}, "Lung cancer": {"description": "If the cancer started somewhere else in the body and spreads to the lungs, it is called metastatic cancer to the lung.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough that does not\u00a0go away", "Coughing up blood", "Fatigue", "Losing weight without trying", "Loss of appetite", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Eyelid drooping", "Facial paralysis", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Joint pain", "Nail problems", "Shoulder pain", "Swallowing difficulty", "Swelling of the face or arms", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Lung cancer is often found when an x-ray or CT scan is done for another reason.If lung cancer is suspected, the doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history. You will be asked if you smoke. If so, you'll be asked how much you smoke and for how long you have smoked. You will also be asked about other things that may have put you at risk of lung cancer, such as exposure to certain chemicals.When listening to the chest with a stethoscope, the doctor may hear fluid around the lungs. This may suggest cancer.Tests that may be\u00a0done to diagnose lung cancer or see if it has spread include:Bone scan, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of the chest, MRI of the chest, Positron emission tomography (PET) scan, Sputum test to look for cancer cells, Thoracentesis (sampling of fluid buildup around the lung) . In\u00a0most cases, a piece of tissue is removed from your lungs for examination under a microscope. This is called a biopsy. There are several ways to do this:Bronchoscopy combined with biopsy, CT-scan-directed needle biopsy, Endoscopic esophageal ultrasound (EUS) with biopsy, Mediastinoscopy with biopsy, Open lung biopsy, Pleural biopsy . If the biopsy shows cancer, more imaging tests are done to find out the stage of the cancer. Stage means how big the tumor is and how far it has spread. Staging helps guide treatment and follow-up and gives you an idea of what to expect. ", "Causes": "Lung cancer is the deadliest type of cancer for both men and women. Each year, more people die of lung cancer than of breast, colon, and prostate cancers combined.Lung cancer is more common in older adults. It is rare in people under age 45.Cigarette smoking is the leading cause of lung cancer. The more cigarettes you smoke per day and the earlier you started smoking, the greater your risk\u00a0of lung cancer. There is no evidence that smoking low-tar cigarettes lowers the risk.Lung cancer can also affect persons who have never smoked.Secondhand smoke (breathing the smoke of others) increases your risk\u00a0of lung cancer.The following may also increase your risk of lung cancer:Exposure to asbestos, Exposure to cancer-causing chemicals such as uranium, beryllium, vinyl chloride, nickel chromates, coal products, mustard gas, chloromethyl ethers, gasoline, and diesel exhaust, Exposure to radon gas, Family history of lung cancer, High levels of air pollution, High levels of arsenic in drinking water, Radiation therapy to the lungs. ", "Prevention": "If you smoke, now is the time to quit. If you are having trouble quitting, talk with your doctor. There are many methods to help you quit, from support groups to prescription medicines. Also, try to avoid secondhand smoke.", "Treatment": "Treatment for lung cancer depends on the type of cancer, how advanced it is, and how healthy you are:Surgery to remove the tumor may be done when it has not spread beyond nearby lymph nodes., Chemotherapy\u00a0uses drugs to kill cancer cells and stop new cells from growing., Radiation therapy uses powerful x-rays or other forms of radiation to kill cancer cells. . The above treatments may be done alone or in combination. Your doctor can tell you more about the specific treatment you will receive."}, "Lacrimal gland tumor": {"Symptoms": ["Double vision", "Fullness in one eyelid or the side of the face", "Pain"], "Exams and Tests": "You may first be examined by an eye doctor (ophthalmologist). You may then be evaluated by a head and neck doctor (otolaryngologist, or ENT), or a doctor who specializes in problems with the bony eye socket (orbit).Tests usually include a CT or MRI scan.", "description": "A lacrimal gland tumor is a tumor in one of the glands that produce tears. The lacrimal glands are located under the outer part of each eyebrow. Lacrimal gland tumors can be harmless (benign) or cancerous (malignant). About half of lacrimal gland tumors are benign.", "Treatment": "Most lacrimal gland tumors will need to be removed with surgery. Cancerous tumors may need other treatment too, such as radiation or chemotherapy."}, "Leydig cell tumor": {"description": "A Leydig cell tumor is a tumor of the testicle. It develops from Leydig cells. These are the cells in the testicles that release the male hormone, testosterone.", "Possible Complications": "Testicular cancer may spread to other parts of the body. The most common sites include the:Abdomen, Lungs, Retroperitoneal area (the area near the kidneys behind the other organs in the belly area), Spine . Complications of surgery can include:Bleeding and infection, Infertility (if both testicles are removed) . If you are of childbearing age, ask your doctor about methods to save your sperm for use at a later date.", "Symptoms": ["Discomfort or pain in the testicle", "Enlargement of a testicle or change in the way it feels", "Excess development of breast tissue (gynecomastia) -- however, this can occur normally in adolescent boys who do not have testicular cancer", "Heaviness in the scrotum", "Lump or swelling in either testicle", "Pain in the lower abdomen or back"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination typically reveals a firm lump in one of the testicles. When the health care provider holds a flashlight up to the scrotum, the light does not pass through the lump.Other tests include:Blood tests for tumor markers: alpha fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotropin (beta HCG), and lactate dehydrogenase (LDH), Chest x-ray, CT scan of the abdomen and pelvis, Ultrasound of the scrotum. An examination of the tissue is usually done after the entire testicle is surgically removed (orchiectomy).", "Treatment": "Treatment of a Leydig cell tumor depends on its stage.Stage I cancer has not spread beyond the testicle., Stage II cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the abdomen., Stage III cancer has spread beyond the lymph nodes (possibly as far as the liver, lungs, or brain). . Surgery is done to remove the testicle (orchiectomy). Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed\u00a0(lymphadenectomy).Chemotherapy may be used to treat this type of tumor. Because Leydig cell tumors are rare, these treatments have not been studied as much as treatments for other, more common testicular cancers.", "Causes": "The cause of this tumor is unknown. There are no known risk factors for getting this tumor. Unlike germ cell tumors of the testicles, this tumor does not seem to be linked to undescended testes.Leydig cell tumors make up a very small number of all testicular tumors. They are most often found in men between the ages of 20 and 60. This tumor is not common in children before puberty, but it may cause early puberty.", "Prevention": "Performing testicular self-examination (TSE) each month may help detect testicular cancer at an early stage, before it spreads. Finding testicular cancer early is important to successful treatment and survival."}, "Lymphogranuloma venereum": {"description": "Lymphogranuloma venereum (LGV) is a sexually transmitted bacterial infection.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal connections between the rectum and vagina (fistula), Brain inflammation (encephalitis - very rare), Infections in the joints, eyes, heart, or liver, Long-term inflammation and swelling of the genitals, Scarring and narrowing of the rectum. Complications can occur many years after you are first infected.", "Symptoms": ["Drainage through the skin from lymph nodes in the groin", "Painful bowel movements (tenesmus)", "Small painless sore on the male genitals or in the female genital tract", "Swelling and redness of the skin in the groin area", "Swelling of the labia (in women)", "Swollen groin lymph nodes on one or both sides; it may also affect lymph nodes around the rectum in people who have anal intercourse", "Blood or pus from the rectum (blood in the stools) \u00a0"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine you and ask about your medical and sexual history. Always tell your health care provider if you had sexual contact with someone who has had symptoms of LGV.A physical exam may show:An oozing, abnormal connection (fistula) in the rectal area, A sore on the genitals, Drainage through the skin from lymph nodes in the groin, Swelling of the vulva or labia in women, Swollen lymph nodes in the groin (inguinal lymphadenopathy). Tests may include:Biopsy of the lymph node, Blood test for the bacteria that causes LGV, Laboratory test to detect chlamydia. ", "Treatment": "LGV is treated with antibiotics.", "Causes": "Lymphogranuloma venereum (LGV) is a chronic (long-term) infection of the lymphatic system. It is\u00a0caused by any of three different types (serovars) of the bacterium Chlamydia trachomatis. The bacteria spread by sexual contact. The infection is not caused by the same bacteria that cause genital chlamydia.LGV is more common in Central and South America than in North America. LGV is more common in men than women. The main risk factor is being HIV-positive.", "Prevention": "Not having any sexual activity is the only way to prevent a sexually transmitted infection. Safer sex behaviors may reduce the risk.The proper use of condoms, either the male or female type, greatly decreases the risk of catching a sexually transmitted infection. You need to wear the condom from the beginning to the end of each sexual activity."}, "Legg-Calve-Perthes disease": {"Symptoms": ["Hip stiffness that\u00a0limits hip\u00a0movement", "Knee pain", "Limited range of motion", "Thigh or groin pain that does not go away", "Shortening of the leg, or legs of unequal length", "Muscle loss\u00a0in the upper thigh"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical examination, the health care provider will look for a loss in hip motion and a typical limp. A hip x-ray or pelvis x-ray may show signs of Legg-Calve-Perthes disease. An MRI scan may be needed.", "description": "Legg-Calve-Perthes disease\u00a0occurs when the ball of the thighbone in the hip does not\u00a0get enough blood, causing the bone to die.", "Causes": "Legg-Calve-Perthes disease usually occurs in boys 4\u00a0through 10 years old. There are many theories about the cause of this disease, but little is actually known.Without enough blood to the area, the bone dies. The ball of the hip collapses and becomes flat. Usually only one hip is affected, although it can occur on both sides.The blood supply returns over several months, bringing in new bone cells. The new cells gradually replace the dead bone over 2\u00a0to 3 years.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to keep the ball of the thigh bone inside the socket. The health care provider may call this containment. The reason for doing this is to make sure the hip continues to have good range of motion.The treatment plan may involve:A short period of bed rest to help with severe pain, Limiting the amount of weight placed on the leg by restricting activities such as running, Physical therapy to help keep the leg and hip muscles strong, Taking anti-inflammatory medicine, such as ibuprofen, to relieve stiffness in the hip joint, Wearing a cast of brace to help with containment, Using crutches or a walker. Surgery may be needed if other treatments do not work. Surgery ranges from lengthening a groin muscle to major hip surgery, called an osteotomy, to reshape the pelvis. The exact type of surgery depends on the severity of the problem and the shape of the ball of the hip joint.It is important for the child to have regular follow-up with the doctor and an orthopaedic specialist."}, "Lactose intolerance": {"description": "Lactose intolerance develops when the small intestine does not make enough of this enzyme.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal bloating", "Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea", "Gas (flatulence)", "Nausea "], "Exams and Tests": "Other intestinal problems, such as irritable bowel syndrome, may cause the same symptoms as lactose intolerance.Tests to help diagnose lactose intolerance include:Lactose-hydrogen breath test, Lactose tolerance test, Stool pH . ", "Causes": "Babies' bodies make the lactase enzyme so they can digest milk, including breast milk.Babies born too early (premature) sometimes have lactose intolerance. , Children who were born at full term often do not show signs of the problem before they are 3 years old.. Lactose intolerance is very common in adults. It is rarely dangerous. Around 30 million American adults have some degree of lactose intolerance by age 20.In Caucasians, lactose intolerance often develops in children older than age 5., In African Americans, the problem can occur as early as age 2., The condition is very common among adults with Asian, African, or Native American heritage. , It is less common in people of northern or western European background, but still may occur. . An illness that involves or injury your small intestine may cause less of the lactase enzyme to be made. Treatment of these illnesses may improve the symptoms of lactose intolerance. These may include:Surgery of the small intestine, Infections in the small intestine (This is most often seen in children), Diseases that damage the small intestines, such as celiac sprue or Crohn's disease. Babies may be born with a genetic defect and are not able to make any of the lactase enzyme.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent lactose intolerance. You can prevent symptoms by avoiding foods with lactose.", "Treatment": "Cutting down your intake of milk products that contain lactose from your diet most often eases symptoms. Also look at food labels for hidden sources of lactose in non-milk products (even some beers) and avoid these.Most people with low lactase levels can drink up to one-half cup of milk at one time (2\u00a0to 4 ounces) without having symptoms. Larger servings (more than 8 oz.) may cause problems for people with the deficiency.Milk products that may be easier to digest include:Buttermilk and cheeses (which contain less lactose than milk), Fermented milk products, such as yogurt, Goat's milk , Ice cream, milkshakes, and aged or hard cheeses, Lactose-free milk and milk products, Lactase-treated cow's milk for older children and adults, Soy formulas for infants younger than 2 years, Soy or rice milk for toddlers. You can add lactase enzymes to regular milk. You can also take these enzymes as capsules or chewable tablets. There are also many lactose-free dairy products available.Not having milk in your diet can lead to a shortage of calcium, vitamin D, riboflavin, and protein. You need 1,000\u00a0to 1,500 mg of calcium each day depending on your age and gender. Some things you can do to get more calcium in your diet are:Take calcium supplements with Vitamin D. Talk to your health provider about which ones to choose., Eat foods that have more calcium (such as leafy greens, oysters, sardines, canned salmon, shrimp, and broccoli)., Drink orange juice with added calcium.. "}, "Leishmaniasis": {"description": "Leishmaniasis is an infectious disease spread by the bite of the female sandfly.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding (hemorrhage), Deadly infections due to immune system damage, Disfigurement of the face. ", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Skin sores, which may become a skin ulcer that heals very slowly", "Stuffy nose, runny nose, and nosebleeds", "Swallowing difficulty", "Ulcers and wearing away (erosion) in the mouth, tongue, gums, lips, nose, and inner nose", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Vomiting", "Abdominal discomfort", "Fever that lasts for weeks; may come and go in cycles", "Night sweats", "Scaly, gray, dark, ashen skin", "Thinning hair", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show signs of an enlarged spleen, liver, and lymph nodes. The patient may have been bitten by sandflies, or was in an area known for leishmaniasis.Tests that may be done to diagnose the condition include:Biopsy of the spleen and culture, Bone marrow biopsy and culture, Direct agglutination assay, Indirect immunofluorescent antibody test, Leishmania-specific PCR test, Liver biopsy and culture, Lymph node biopsy and culture, Montenegro skin test (not approved in the USA), Skin biopsy and culture . Other tests that may be done include:Complete blood count, Serologic testing, Serum albumin, Serum immunoglobulin levels, Serum protein. ", "Treatment": "Medicines called antimony-containing compounds are the main drugs used to treat leishmaniasis. These include:Meglumine antimoniate, Sodium stibogluconate. Other drugs that may be used include:Amphotericin B, Ketoconazole, Miltefosine, Paromomycin, Pentamidine. Plastic surgery may be needed to correct the disfigurement caused by sores on the face (cutaneous leishmaniasis). Patients with drug-resistant viral leishmaniasis may need to have their spleen removed (splenectomy).", "Causes": "There are different forms of leishmaniasis.Cutaneous leishmaniasis affects the skin and mucous membranes. Skin sores usually start at the site of the sandfly bite. In a few people, sores may develop on mucous membranes., Systemic, or visceral, leishmaniasis affects the entire body. This form occurs 2 - 8 months after a person is bitten by the sandfly. Most people do not remember having a skin sore. This form can lead to deadly complications. The parasites damage the immune system by decreasing the numbers of disease-fighting cells.. Cases of leishmaniasis have been reported on all continents except Australia and Antarctica. In the Americas, leishmaniasis can be found in Mexico and South America. Leishmaniasis has been reported in military personnel returning from the Persian Gulf.", "Prevention": "Preventing sandfly bites is the most immediate form of protection. You can prevent a bite by:Putting fine mesh netting around the bed (in areas where the disease occurs), Screening windows, Wearing insect repellent, Wearing protective clothing. Public health measures to reduce the sandfly population and animal reservoirs are important. There are no vaccines or drugs that prevent leishmaniasis."}, "Lactic acidosis": {"Symptoms": ["Nausea", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests to check electrolyte levels. ", "description": "Lactic acidosis is when lactic acid builds ups in the bloodstream faster than it can be removed. Lactic acid is produced when oxygen levels in the body drop.", "Causes": "The most common cause of lactic acidosis is intense exercise. However, it can also be caused by certain diseases, such as:AIDS, Cancer, Kidney failure, Respiratory failure, Sepsis. A common medicine used to treat diabetes called metformin\u00a0can also cause lactic acidosis. If you take this medicine,\u00a0have your electrolyte levels checked 1 - 2 weeks after starting it.", "Treatment": "The main treatment for lactic acidosis is to correct the medical problem that causes the condition."}, "Lyme disease": {"description": "Lyme disease is a bacterial infection that is spread through the bite of one of several types of ticks.", "Possible Complications": "Stage 3, or late disseminated, Lyme disease can cause long-term joint inflammation (Lyme arthritis) and heart rhythm problems. Brain and nervous system problems are also possible, and may include:Decreased concentration, Memory disorders, Nerve damage, Numbness, Pain, Paralysis of the face muscles, Sleep disorders, Vision problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "General ill feeling", "Headache", "Joint pain", "Muscle pain", "Stiff neck", "Numbness or pain in the nerve area", "Paralysis or weakness in the muscles of the face", "Heart problems, such as skipped heartbeats (palpitations), chest pain, or shortness of breath ", "Abnormal muscle movement", "Joint swelling", "Muscle weakness", "Numbness and tingling", "Speech problems", "Thinking (cognitive) problems "], "Exams and Tests": "A blood test can be done to check for antibodies to the bacteria that cause Lyme disease. The most commonly used is the ELISA for Lyme disease test. An immunoblot test is done to confirm ELISA results. Be aware, though, in the early stage of infection, blood tests may be normal.In areas where Lyme disease is more common, your health care provider may be able to diagnose early disseminated Lyme disease (Stage 2) without doing any lab tests. Other tests that may be done when the infection has spread include:Electrocardiogram, Echocardiogram to look at the heart, MRI of the brain, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture to examine spinal fluid . ", "Treatment": "Persons bitten by a tick should be watched closely for at least 30 days to see if a rash or symptoms develop.A single dose of the antibiotic doxycycline may be given to someone soon after being bitten by a tick, when all of these conditions are true:The person has a tick that can carry Lyme disease attached to his or her body. This usually means that a nurse or doctor has looked at and identified the tick., The tick is thought to have been attached to the person for at least 36 hours., The person is able to start taking the antibiotic within 72 hours of removing the tick., The person is 8 years or older and is not pregnant or breastfeeding., Local rate of ticks carrying B. burgdorferi is 20 percent or higher.. A 10 day to 4-week course of antibiotics is used to treat people who are diagnosed with Lyme disease, depending on the choice of drug: The choice of antibiotic depends on the stage of the disease and the symptoms., Common choices include doxycycline, amoxicillin, azithromycin, cefuroxime, and ceftriaxone.. Pain medicines, such as ibuprofen, are sometimes prescribed for joint stiffness.", "Causes": "Lyme disease is caused by bacteria called Borrelia burgdorferi (B. burgdorferi). Blacklegged ticks and other species of ticks can carry these bacteria. The ticks pick up the bacteria when they bite mice or deer that are infected with B. burgdorferi. You can get the disease if you are bitten by an infected tick.Lyme disease was first reported in the United States in 1977\u00a0in the town of Old Lyme, Connecticut. The same disease occurs in many parts of Europe and Asia. In the United States, most Lyme disease infections occur in the following areas:Northeastern states, from Virginia to Maine, North-central states, mostly in Wisconsin and Minnesota, West Coast, mainly in the northwest . There are 3 stages of Lyme disease. Stage 1 is called early localized Lyme disease. The infection has not yet spread throughout the body., Stage 2 is called early disseminated Lyme disease. The bacteria have begun to spread throughout the body., Stage 3 is called late disseminated Lyme disease. The bacteria have spread throughout the body.. Risk factors for Lyme disease include:Doing outside activities that increase tick exposure (for example, gardening, hunting, or hiking) in an area where Lyme disease is known to occur, Having a pet that may carry ticks home, Walking in high grasses. Important facts about tick bites and Lyme disease:In most cases in the U.S., a tick must be attached to your body for 24 - 36 hours to spread the bacteria to your blood. Ticks that cause Lyme disease in Europe transmit the bacteria more quickly, within 24 hours., Blacklegged ticks can be so small that they are almost impossible to see. Many people with Lyme disease never even see or feel\u00a0a tick on their body., Most people who are bitten by a tick do not get Lyme disease. . ", "Prevention": "Take precautions to avoid tick bites. Be extra careful during warmer months. When possible, avoid walking or hiking in the woods and areas with high grass.If you do walk or hike in these areas, take measures to prevent tick bites:Wear light-colored clothing so that if ticks land on you, they can be spotted and removed. , Wear long sleeves and long pants with pant legs tucked into your socks., Spray exposed skin and your clothing with insect repellant, such as DEET or permethrin. , After returning home, remove your clothes and thoroughly inspect all skin surface areas, including your scalp. Shower as soon as possible to wash off any unseen ticks.. If a tick is attached to you, follow these steps to remove it:Grasp the tick close to its head or mouth with tweezers. Do not use your bare fingers. If needed, use a tissue or paper towel., Pull it straight out with a slow and steady motion. Avoid squeezing or crushing the tick. Be careful not to leave the head embedded in the skin., Clean the area thoroughly with soap and water. Also wash your hands thoroughly., Save the tick in a jar. , Watch carefully for the next week or two for signs of Lyme disease., If all parts of the tick cannot be removed, get medical help. Bring the tick in the jar to your doctor appointment.. "}, "Liver spots": {"description": "Liver spots are flat, brown or black spots that can appear on areas of the skin that are exposed to the sun. They have nothing to do with the liver or liver function.", "Symptoms": ["Flat", "Light brown to black", "Painless "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will diagnose the condition based on how your skin looks, especially if you are over 40 and have had a lot of sun exposure. You may need a skin biopsy to confirm the diagnosis if you have a liver spot that looks irregular. ", "Causes": "Liver spots are changes in skin color that occur in older skin. The coloring may be due to aging, exposure to the sun or other sources of ultraviolet light, or causes that are not known.Liver spots are very common after age 40. They occur most often on areas that have had the greatest sun exposure, such as the:Backs of the hands, Face, Forearms, Forehead, Shoulders. ", "Prevention": "Protect your skin from the sun by taking the following steps:Cover your skin with clothing such as hats, long-sleeved shirts, long skirts, or pants., Use sunglasses to protect your eyes., Try to avoid the sun at midday, when sunlight is strongest., Use high-quality sunscreens that have an SPF rating of at least 30. Apply sunscreen at least a half hour before you go out in the sun. Reapply it often. Use sunscreen in the winter, too. . ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, no treatment is needed. You can improve the appearance of your skin by using skin bleaching lotions or creams. Most bleaching lotions use hydroquinone. This medicine is thought to be safe in the form used to lighten darkened skin areas. However, hydroquinone can cause blisters or skin reactions in some people. See your health care provider before starting treatment if you are concerned.Freezing (cryotherapy) or laser treatment can be used to destroy the liver spots."}, "Lambert-Eaton syndrome": {"description": "Lambert-Eaton syndrome is a disorder in which faulty communication between nerves and muscles leads to muscle weakness.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty breathing, including respiratory failure, Difficulty swallowing, Infections, such as pneumonia, Injuries from falls and problems with coordination. ", "Symptoms": ["Weakness or loss of movement that can be more or less severe, including difficulty chewing, difficulty climbing stairs, difficulty lifting objects, difficulty talking, drooping of the head, and the need to use the hands to get up from a sitting or lying position", "Swallowing difficulty, gagging, or choking", "Vision changes, such as blurry vision, double vision, and problems keeping a steady gaze ", "Blood pressure changes", "Dizziness upon standing", "Dry mouth"], "Exams and Tests": "A detailed medical history will be taken to determine risk factors, such as a history of certain cancers.A physical examination shows:Decreased reflexes, Possible loss of muscle tissue, Weakness or paralysis that gets slightly better with activity. Tests to help diagnose and confirm the condition may include:Blood tests to look for the antibodies that attack the nerves, Electromyography (EMG) to test the health of the muscle fibers, Nerve conduction velocity (NCV) to test the speed of electrical activity along nerves. ", "Treatment": "The main goals of treatment are to:Identify and treat any underlying disorders, such as lung cancer, Give treatment to help with the weakness. A treatment called plasma exchange or plasmapheresis usually improves symptoms. This involves removing blood plasma from the body and replacing it with other proteins (such as albumin) or with donated plasma. This helps make sure that any harmful proteins (antibodies) that are interfering with nerve function are removed from the body.Medications that suppress the immune response, such as prednisone, may improve symptoms in some cases. Medications may also include:Anticholinesterase medications, such as neostigmine or pyridostigmine (although these are not very effective when given alone), 3, 4-diaminopyridine, which increases the release of acetylcholine from nerve cells. ", "Causes": "Lambert-Eaton syndrome is an autoimmune disorder. This means your immune system mistakenly targets healthy cells and tissues in the body. In this syndrome, antibodies produced by the immune system attack nerve cells. This makes nerves cells unable to release enough of a chemical called acetylcholine. This chemical transmits impulses between nerves and muscles.The result is muscle weakness.Lambert-Eaton syndrome may occur with cancers such as small cell lung cancer or autoimmune disorders such as vitiligo, which leads to a loss of skin pigment."}, "Low blood pressure": {"description": "The medical name for low blood pressure is hypotension.", "Possible Complications": "Falls due to low blood pressure in older adults\u00a0can lead to a broken hip or spine\u00a0fracture. These injuries can reduce a person's health and ability to move aroundSudden severe drops in your blood pressure starves your body of oxygen. This can lead to damage of the heart, brain, and other organs. This type of\u00a0low blood pressure\u00a0can be life threatening if not treated right away.", "Symptoms": ["Blurry vision", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Fainting (syncope)", "Lightheadedness", "Nausea or vomiting", "Sleepiness", "Weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine you to determine\u00a0the cause of your\u00a0low blood pressure. Your vital signs (temperature, pulse, rate of breathing, blood pressure) will be checked frequently. You may need to stay in the hospital for a while.The doctor will ask questions, including:What is your normal blood pressure?, What medications do you take?, Have you been eating and drinking normally?, Have you had any recent illness, accident, or injury?, What other symptoms do you have?, Did you faint or become less alert?, Do you feel dizzy or light-headed when standing or sitting after lying down? . The following tests may be done:Basic metabolic panel, Blood cultures to check for infection, Complete blood count (CBC), including blood differential, ECG, Urinalysis, X-ray of the abdomen, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Lower than normal\u00a0blood pressure\u00a0in a healthy person that does not cause any\u00a0symptoms\u00a0often does not\u00a0need treatment. Otherwise, treatment depends on the cause of your low blood pressure and your symptoms.When you have symptoms from a drop in blood pressure, sit or lie down right away. Then raise your feet above heart level.Severe hypotension caused by shock is a medical emergency. You may be given:Blood through a needle (IV), Medicines to increase blood pressure and improve heart strength, Other medicines, such as antibiotics . Treatments for low blood pressure after standing up too quickly include:If medicines are the cause, your doctor may change the dosage or switch you to a different drug. Do not\u00a0stop taking any medicines before talking to your doctor. , Your doctor may suggest drinking\u00a0more fluids to treat dehydration. , Wearing\u00a0compression stockings can help keep blood from collecting in the legs. This keeps more blood in the upper body.. Persons\u00a0with NMH should avoid triggers, such as standing for a long period of time. Other treatments include drinking fluids and increasing salt in your diet. Talk to your doctor before trying these measures. In severe cases, medicines\u00a0 may be prescribed.", "Causes": "Blood pressure\u00a0varies from\u00a0one person\u00a0to another.\u00a0A drop as little as 20 mmHg, can cause problems for some people. There are different types and causes of low blood pressure.Severe hypotension can be caused by sudden loss of blood (shock), severe infection, heart attack, or severe allergic reaction (anaphylaxis).\u00a0Orthostatic hypotension is\u00a0caused by a sudden change in body position. This occurs\u00a0most often when you\u00a0shift from lying down to standing. This type of\u00a0low blood pressure\u00a0usually lasts only a few seconds or minutes. If this type of\u00a0low blood pressure\u00a0occurs after eating, it is called postprandial orthostatic hypotension. This\u00a0type most\u00a0often affects older adults, those with high blood pressure, and persons with Parkinson disease.Neurally mediated hypotension (NMH)\u00a0most often affects young adults and children. It\u00a0can occur when a person has been standing for a long time. Children usually outgrow this type of hypotension.Certain\u00a0medicines and substances\u00a0can lead to low blood pressure,\u00a0including:Alcohol, Anti-anxiety medicines, Certain antidepressants, Diuretics, Heart medicines, including those used to treat high blood pressure and coronary heart disease, Medicines used for surgery, Painkillers. Other causes of low blood pressure include:Nerve damage from diabetes, Changes in heart rhythm (arrhythmias), Not drinking enough fluids (dehydration) , Heart failure. ", "Prevention": "Your doctor may recommend certain steps to prevent or reduce your symptoms including:Drinking\u00a0more fluids, Getting up slowly after sitting or lying down, Not drinking\u00a0alcohol, Not\u00a0standing for a long time (if you have NMH)\u00a0, Using compression stockings\u00a0so\u00a0blood does not collect in the legs . "}, "Lymphangitis ": {"description": "Lymphangitis is an infection of the lymph vessels (channels).\u00a0It is a complication of\u00a0some bacterial infections.", "Possible Complications": "Abscess (collection of pus), Cellulitis (a skin infection), Sepsis (a general or bloodstream infection). ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Enlarged and tender\u00a0lymph nodes (glands) -- usually in the elbow, armpit, or groin", "Fever", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle aches", "Red streaks from the infected area to the armpit or groin (may be faint or obvious)", "Throbbing pain along the affected area"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam, which includes feeling your lymph nodes. The doctor may look for signs of injury around swollen lymph nodes.A biopsy and culture of the affected area may reveal the cause of the inflammation. A blood culture may be done to see if the infection has spread to the blood.", "Treatment": "Lymphangitis may spread within hours. Treatment should begin promptly.Treatment may include:Antibiotics to treat any infection, Pain medicine to control pain, Anti-inflammatory medicines to reduce inflammation and swelling, Warm, moist compresses to reduce inflammation and pain. Surgery may be needed to drain an abscess.", "Causes": "The lymph system is a network of lymph nodes, lymph ducts, lymph vessels, and organs that produce and move a fluid called lymph from tissues to the bloodstream.Lymphangitis most often results from an acute streptococcal infection of the skin. Less often, it is caused by a staphylococcal infection. The infection causes the lymph vessels to become inflamed.Lymphangitis may be a sign that a skin infection is getting worse. The bacteria\u00a0can spread into the blood, and cause life-threatening problems."}, "Laryngeal nerve damage": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty speaking", "Difficulty swallowing", "Hoarseness"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will\u00a0check if\u00a0your vocal cords move abnormally. Abnormal movement may mean that a laryngeal nerve is injured.Tests may include:Bronchoscopy, CT scan of the chest, Laryngoscopy, MRI of the brain, neck, and chest, X-ray. ", "description": "Laryngeal nerve damage is injury to one or both of the nerves that are attached to the voice box.", "Causes": "Injury to the laryngeal nerves is uncommon.It it does occur, it\u00a0can be\u00a0from:A complication of neck or chest surgery (especially thyroid, lung, heart surgery, or cervical spine surgery), A breathing tube in the windpipe (endotracheal tube), A viral infection that affects the nerves, Tumors in the neck or upper chest, such as thyroid or lung cancer. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the injury. In some instances, no treatment may be needed and the nerve may recover on its own. Voice therapy is useful in some cases.If surgery is needed, the goal is to change the position of the paralyzed vocal cord to improve the voice. This can be done with:Arytenoid adduction (stitches to move the vocal cord toward the middle of the airway), Injections of collagen, Gelfoam, or another substance, Thyroplasty. If both the left and right nerves are damaged, a hole may need to be cut into the windpipe (tracheotomy) right away to allow breathing. This is followed by another surgery at a later date."}, "Listeriosis": {"description": "Listeriosis is an infection that can occur when a person eats food that has been contaminated with bacteria called Listeria monocytogenes (L. monocytogenes).", "Possible Complications": "Infants who survive listeriosis may have long-term brain and nervous system (neurological) damage and delayed development.", "Symptoms": ["Loss of appetite", "Lethargy", "Jaundice", "Respiratory distress (usually pneumonia)", "Shock", "Skin rash", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests may be done to detect the bacteria in amniotic fluid, blood, feces, and urine. A CSF culture will be performed if a spinal tap is performed.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics (including ampicillin or trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole) are prescribed to kill the bacteria that are causing the infection.", "Causes": "The bacterium Listeria monocytogenes is found in wild animals, domesticated animals, and in soil and water. These bacteria make many animals sick, leading to miscarriage and stillbirth in domestic animals.Vegetables, meats, and other foods you eat can get infected with the bacteria if they come in contact with contaminated soil or manure. Raw milk or products made from raw milk may carry these bacteria.If you eat the contaminated products, you may get sick. The following people are at increased risk:Adults over age 50, Adults with a weakened immune system, Developing fetuses, Newborns, Pregnant women. The bacteria most often cause a gastrointestinal illness. In some cases, you can develop a blood infection (septicemia) or inflammation of the covering of the brain (meningitis). Infants who are 5 days or older and children often have meningitis.Infection in early pregnancy may cause a miscarriage. The bacteria may cross the placenta and infect the developing baby. Infections in late pregnancy may lead to stillbirth or death of the infant within a few hours of birth. About half of infants infected at or near term will die.In adults, the disease may take many forms, depending on what organ or organ systems are infected. It may occur as:Heart infection (endocarditis) , Brain or spinal fluid injection (meningitis), Lung infection (pneumonia) , Blood infection (septicemia) . Or it may occur in a milder form as:Abscesses, Conjunctivitis, Gastroenteritis, Skin lesion. ", "Prevention": "Pregnant women should avoid contact with wild and domestic animals. Listeria is well controlled in American food products, but food-associated outbreaks have occurred.Pregnant women should avoid eating soft cheeses, deli meats, and cold salads from salad bars. Foreign food products such as non-pasteurized soft cheeses have also led to outbreaks of listeriosis. Always cook food thoroughly."}, "Lacquer poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Blood in urine", "No urine production (kidney failure)", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Abdominal pain -- severe", "Bloody stools", "Burns and possible holes of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Brain damage", "Sleepiness", "Stupor", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Labyrinthitis": {"description": "Labyrinthitis is irritation and swelling of the inner ear. It can cause vertigo and hearing loss.", "Possible Complications": "You can injure yourself or others during attacks of vertigo, Permanent hearing loss (rare) . ", "Symptoms": ["Feeling like you are spinning, even when you are still (vertigo)", "Your eyes moving on their own, making it hard to focus them", "Dizziness", "Hearing loss in one ear", "Loss of balance; you may fall toward one side", "Nausea and vomiting", "Ringing or other noises in your ears (tinnitus) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor may give you a physical exam. You may also have tests of your nervous system (neurological exam).Tests can rule out other causes of your symptoms. These may include:EEG, Electronystagmography,\u00a0and warming and cooling the inner ear with air or water to test eye reflexes (caloric stimulation), Head CT scan, Hearing tests (audiology/audiometry), MRI of the head . ", "Treatment": "Labyrinthitis usually goes away within a few weeks. Treatment can help reduce vertigo and other symptoms. Medicines that may help include:Antihistamines, Medicines to control nausea and vomiting, such as prochlorperazine (Compazine), Medicines relieve dizziness, such as meclizine (Bonine, Dramamine, or Antivert) or scopolamine (Transderm-Scop), Sedatives, such as diazepam (Valium), Steroids (Prednisone), Antiviral agents . Doing these things can help you manage vertigo:Stay still and rest., Avoid sudden movements or position changes., Slowly resume activity. You may need help walking when you lose your balance during attacks., Avoid bright lights, TV, and reading during attacks. Rest during severe episodes, and slowly increase your activity., Ask your health care provider about balance therapy. This may help once nausea and vomiting have passed.. You should avoid the following for 1 week after symptoms disappear:Driving, Operating heavy machinery, Climbing. A sudden dizzy spell during these activities can be dangerous.", "Causes": "Labyrinthitis is usually caused by a virus and sometimes by bacteria. Having a cold or flu can trigger the condition. Less often, an ear infection may lead to labyrinthitis. Other causes include allergies or certain drugs that are bad for the inner ear. Your inner ear is important for both hearing and balance. When you have labyrinthitis, the parts of your inner ear become irritated and swollen. This can make you lose your balance and cause hearing loss.These factors raise your risk for labyrinthitis:Drinking large amounts of alcohol, Fatigue, History of allergies, Recent viral illness, respiratory infection, or ear infection, Smoking, Stress, Using certain prescription or nonprescription drugs (such as aspirin) . ", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent labyrinthitis."}, "Lithium toxicity": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Nausea", "Stomach pains", "Vomiting", "Weakness ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness, lack of responsiveness)", "Hand tremors", "Incoordination of arms and legs (ataxia)", "Muscle twitches", "Seizures", "Slurred speech", "Uncontrollable eye movement (nystagmus) ", "Increased reflexes", "Slurred speech", "Tremors ", "Kidney failure", "Memory problems", "Movement disorders", "Problems keeping salts in your body", "Psychosis (thought disturbance, unpredictable behavior)"], "description": "See: Overdose"}}